Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Watershed Conservancy Districts

262.700.
Watershed conservancy districts — Formation — Purposes.

Subdistricts of a soil conservation district may be formed in a watershed area, as provided in KRS

262.700

to

262.795

, to be known as watershed conservancy districts, for the purpose of developing and executing plans and programs relating to any phase of conservation of water, water usage, flood prevention, flood control, erosion prevention and control of erosion, floodwater and sediment damages. As a subdistrict of a soil conservation district, a watershed conservancy district shall constitute a governmental subdivision of the state and a public body corporate and politic exercising public power.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 1; 1964, ch. 117, § 2; 1984, ch. 218, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by 1984 Acts Chapter 100, § 22, and 1984 Acts Chapter 218, § 5, which conflict and cannot be compiled together. Pursuant to KRS

446.250

, the amendment in Chapter 218, § 5 prevails as the later enactment.

262.705.
District area — Requirements of.

The land area embraced in such districts must be contiguous and must lie within a well defined watershed. The area shall not include lands located within the boundary of any incorporated city or town or lands not included within a soil and water conservation district, unless such lands are brought in the boundaries of a soil and water conservation district through the process of petition, hearing, and referendum as prescribed in KRS

262.100

,

262.110

, and

262.120

. The area shall not include lands embraced within another watershed conservancy district, but may include lands lying in one or more soil and water conservation districts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 2; 1964, ch. 117, § 3; 1966, ch. 23, § 69.

262.707.
New district within an established district.

If it appears that contiguous territory within an established district would be better served by the organization of a separate district, a petition for withdrawal and formation of a new district may be filed with the board of supervisors by twenty-five (25) or more landowners, or a majority if less than fifty (50) landowners are involved. The petition shall define the boundary involved, state that all obligations to the district have been met, and contain such other information as is necessary for a determination of the feasibility or nonfeasibility of such withdrawal and reorganization. Filing of petition and further proceedings shall be governed by KRS

262.715

to

262.735

, as far as practicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 172, effective June 19, 1958.

262.710.
Petition for formation — Contents — Filing.

When twenty-five (25) or more landowners within a proposed watershed conservancy district, or, if less than fifty (50) landowners are involved, a majority of the landowners in such proposed district, desire to form a watershed conservancy district, they shall file a petition with the board of supervisors of the soil conservation district. Such petition shall define the boundaries of the proposed district, the number of acres of land involved, reasons for requesting creation of such district, the proposed name for such watershed conservancy district, and other information pertinent to such proposal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 3, effective May 18, 1956.

262.715.
Formation of districts in areas involving more than one soil conservation district — Filing petition — Board of supervisors.

If the proposed watershed conservancy district lies in more than one soil conservation district, the petition may be presented to the board of supervisors of any one of such districts and the supervisors of all such districts shall act as a joint board of supervisors in the formation and supervision of such a watershed conservancy district except in the election of directors where each soil conservation district board of supervisors shall supervise the election, or appointments to fill vacancies, of directors to represent their district on the conservancy district board of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 4; 1964, ch. 117, § 7.

262.720.
Notice — Parties — Hearing — Determination — Proposed maximum budget.

Within thirty (30) days after such petition has been filed with the board of supervisors, it shall cause due notice to be given as provided in KRS 262.010(4) of the hearing upon the practicability and feasibility of creating such subdistrict. All interested parties shall have the right to attend such hearing and be heard. If it shall appear at the hearing that other lands should be included or that lands included in the petition should be excluded, the board of supervisors may permit such inclusion or exclusion, provided the land area involved still meets the requirements of KRS

262.705

.

If it appears upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district, territory outside of the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing shall be adjourned and due notice of a further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district and a further hearing shall be held. After final hearing, if the board of supervisors determines, upon the facts presented at the hearing and upon other available information, that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare for such a district to function in the territory considered, it shall make and record the determination and shall define, by metes and bounds, or by recognizable terrain features and description, the boundaries of the watershed district.

If the board determines after the hearing that it is not feasible for such district to function in the territory considered, it shall make and record the determination and shall deny the petition.

If the board determines that there is a need for a conservancy district, the board of supervisors shall establish a proposed maximum budget for the maintenance of the proposed conservancy district, to be funded either by millage or flat rate sufficient to meet the budget.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 5; 1964, ch. 117, § 8; 2000, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

262.725.
Referendum — Notice — Polling officers.

After the board of supervisors has made and recorded a determination that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for creation of the proposed watershed conservancy district, it shall consider the question whether the operation of a district within the proposed boundaries with the powers conferred upon such districts in KRS

262.745

is administratively practicable and feasible. To assist the board of supervisors in this determination, the board shall, within a reasonable time after entry of the finding that there is need for the organization of the district and the determination of the boundaries of the district, hold a referendum within the conservation district upon the proposition of the creation of the district to identify boundaries and give notification of funding options. Due notice of the referendum shall be given as provided in KRS 262.010(4). Such notice shall state the date of holding the referendum, the hours of opening and closing the polls, and shall designate one or more places within the proposed district as polling places. The board shall appoint a polling superintendent and other necessary polling officers giving equal representation to the proponents and opponents of the question involved.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 6, effective May 18, 1956; 2000, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

262.730.
Question — Eligibility of voters — Absentee voting.

The question to be voted on shall be submitted in the following form:

“For the creation of
. . . . .
Watershed Conservancy District”

“Against the creation of
. . . . .
Watershed Conservancy District”

The voters shall be instructed to vote “yes” on one or the other of the propositions, as the voter may favor or oppose creation of the district. The boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the board of supervisors shall be set forth. Only owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the territory shall be eligible to vote in the referendum. Qualified voters may vote by absentee vote in such referendum under rules set out in KRS Chapter 117.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 7; 1964, ch. 117, § 9; 1966, ch. 23, § 70; 1980, ch. 188, § 237, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 360, § 80, effective July 15, 1982.

262.735.
Tabulation of votes — Certification — Filing.

The votes shall be counted by the election officers at the close of the polls and report of the results, along with the votes which have been cast, delivered to the polling superintendent, who shall certify the results to the board of supervisors. If a majority of the votes cast favor creation of the district, the board of supervisors shall certify such results to the county clerk in the county or counties involved. Upon proper recording of such action such watershed conservancy district shall be duly created. After recording, the certification shall be filed with the State Soil Conservation Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 8, effective May 18, 1956; 1978, ch. 384, § 386, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 360, § 81, effective July 15, 1982.

262.740.
Board of directors — Election — Membership — Terms — Officers — Bond of treasurer — Nomination petitions — Qualification of members — Removal of directors.

Within thirty (30) days after a watershed conservancy district is created, nominating petitions may be filed with the board of supervisors for the election of a board of directors consisting of five (5) members, who shall hold office for a term of four (4) years, or until a successor is qualified. Such board of directors shall, under the supervision of the board of supervisors, be the governing body of the watershed conservancy district. The board of supervisors shall give due notice of the election of directors and shall, as nearly as practicable, conduct the election in the manner prescribed by KRS

262.220

.

If the territory embraced within a watershed conservancy district lies within more than one (1) soil and water conservation district, each of said additional districts with minority of the land involved in the watershed shall be entitled to elect three (3) additional directors.

The board of directors shall annually elect from its membership a chairman, secretary, and treasurer. The treasurer shall execute an official bond for the faithful performance of the duties of his office to be approved by the board of directors. Such bond shall be executed with at least three (3) solvent personal sureties whose solvency must exceed the amount of the bond, or by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, and shall be in an amount determined by the board of directors. If the treasurer is required to execute a surety company bond, the premium on the bond shall be paid by the board of directors.

Each person desiring to be a director of a watershed conservancy district shall file a nominating petition with the board of supervisors of the county in which he is a landowner and legal resident, signed by twenty-five (25) or more landowners within the watershed conservancy district of the county involved, or, if less than fifty (50) landowners are involved a majority of such landowners. Nominating petitions for the election of any director following the first election of members of the board after creation of the district shall be filed with the board of supervisors not less than forty-five (45) days prior to the day of the regular election. If the candidates nominated do not exceed the positions available, they shall be declared elected. No person shall be eligible to be a director of a watershed conservancy district who is not a landowner within the watershed and resident of the county in which the watershed is located.

A director who has been declared elected without an election pursuant to subsection (4) of this section may be removed from office by the board of supervisors as provided by KRS

65.007

for removal of an appointed member of the governing body of a special district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 9; 1962, ch. 27; 1964, ch. 117, § 4; 1966, ch. 23, § 71; 1980, ch. 18, § 23, effective July 15, 1980.

262.742.
Vacancy on board of directors.

A vacancy on the board of directors of a watershed conservancy district shall be filled by the board of supervisors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 96, § 3, effective June 16, 1960.

262.745.
Powers of board of directors.

Subject to the approval of the board of supervisors, the board of directors of a watershed conservancy district shall have power to:

Levy an annual tax on the real property within the district within the limitations provided in KRS

262.760

for administration, construction, operation and maintenance of works of improvement within the district.

Acquire by purchase, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or through condemnation proceedings in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, the fee simple title or any lesser interest in land including easements and flowage rights as are necessary for the exercise of any authorized function of the district, and for such purpose, may cause examinations and surveys to be made of any lands, easements or rights-of-way necessary for the performance of any authorized function of the district.

Construct, improve, operate and maintain such structures as may be necessary for the performance of any function authorized by KRS

262.700

to

262.795

.

Borrow such money as is necessary for the purpose of acquiring lands or rights-of-way and establishing, constructing, reconstructing, repairing, enlarging and maintaining such structures and improvements as are required by the district in the performance of its functions, and issue, negotiate and sell its bonds as provided in KRS

262.750

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 10; 1960, ch. 96, § 1; 1964, ch. 117, § 5; 1966, ch. 23, § 72; 1976, ch. 140, § 98.

262.748.
Resolution for maintenance and operation of project — Notice — Hearing — Election — Assessment.

Upon determination by the board of directors of a watershed conservancy district that the improvement, continuing operation, or maintenance of a watershed project is necessary, the board of directors may adopt a resolution which shall set out:

A list of the benefited lands located in the flood plain, as determined by the board of directors, giving the acreage of such lands and the names of the owners thereof as defined by KRS 262.010(7) with a classification of such lands or parts thereof into classes in order that assessments may be made according to direct benefits; and

The annual assessments to be levied upon the lands set out in the resolution on the basis of a certain amount per acre according to benefits received, not to exceed in any one (1) year a sum per acre specified in the resolution.

The board of directors shall cause due notice of the resolution to be given to all the owners of benefited lands, as determined by the board. Said notice shall set out the time and place of a meeting of the board of directors of the watershed conservancy district at which owners of benefited lands who may be liable for the annual assessments may be heard.

At the hearing upon the resolution, owners of benefited lands may voice their views concerning the proposal as to whether it should be undertaken, and the scope thereof, or the degree of benefit received by their lands. The board shall prepare a record summarizing the proceedings. If the board of directors determines as a result of the hearing that the proposal should be carried out as planned, it may make such changes or revisions in the resolution as it deems proper and shall give due notice of an election to be held at which benefited landowners may vote on the question of annual special assessments to defray the cost. The notice of the election shall include the text of the resolution of the board in its final form. The board of directors may give due notice as provided in KRS 262.010(4).

The board of directors shall prepare the following question to be presented to the voters: “Should the assessment for improvement, continuing operation, or maintenance proposed by resolution of the . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Watershed Conservancy District be adopted?” Voters shall be instructed to vote “yes” or “no” on the proposition. Only owners of benefited land as set out in the resolution shall be eligible to vote. The board of directors may provide for a meeting of the landowners at which the vote may be cast, in which case qualified voters may vote by absentee vote. The board shall appoint a polling superintendent and other necessary election officers, giving representation to the opponents of the question as well as to proponents.

If a majority of those voting upon the proposition favor the assessment the board shall give due notice of the vote. Any owner of property to be benefited by the project may, within forty (40) days after publication of such notice, file an action in the Circuit Court of the county in which his lands are located seeking relief by declaratory judgment or injunction. If a suit is filed, the county attorney shall represent the board of directors in upholding the validity of the proposed assessment. After the lapse of time specified herein all actions by owners of properties to be benefited shall be forever barred.

If no suit is filed and no injunction issued within the time allowed in subsection (5) of this section, the board of directors shall levy annual assessments effective only upon the benefited properties and based on the acreage thereof. The annual assessment shall be made by the board of directors at the same time and in the same manner as provided in KRS

262.765

for taxes generally and shall be collected as provided in KRS

262.770

. The assessments shall constitute liens against the land benefited and shall attach to the land, taking precedence over all other liens except state, county and municipal taxes and prior improvement assessments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 332, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 360, § 82, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 51, § 7, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is apparent that a watershed conservancy district can now provide by the procedures set out in the statute annual assessments to maintain, operate and provide for improvements to the districts and the lands involved in the district.

OAG 78-561

.

262.750.
Bonds.

Bonds authorized by KRS

262.745

shall not be issued until proposed by order or resolution of the board of directors, specifying the purpose for which the funds are to be used and the proposed undertaking, the amount of bonds to be issued, the rate of interest they are to bear and the amount of any necessary tax levy authorized in KRS

262.760

to establish a sinking fund for the liquidation of bonds as provided in KRS

262.760

. Copy of the order or resolution shall be certified to the board of supervisors.

The board of supervisors shall conduct a hearing on such proposal after notice given pursuant to KRS 262.010(4). If it appears that the proposal is within the scope and purpose of KRS

262.700

to

262.795

and meets all other requirements of the law, the proposal shall be submitted to the landowners of the district by referendum under supervision of the board of supervisors.

Provisions of KRS

262.725

,

262.730

and

262.740

as to notice, qualifications of voters, absentee voting and manner of holding referendum election in organizing a watershed conservancy district shall apply to the referendum held under this section.

If the landowners voting favor the proposal, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 66, the bonds may be issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 11, effective May 18, 1956; 1978, ch. 332, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 218, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 280, § 25, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by 1984 Acts Chapter 100, § 23, and 1984 Acts Chapter 218, § 6, which are in conflict and cannot be compiled together. Pursuant to KRS

446.250

, the amendment in Chapter 218, § 6 prevails as the later amendment.

262.755.
Compensation of members of board of directors — Expenses.

Members of the board of directors shall receive no salaries, but such members may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenditures incurred in the performance of their duties, or may be paid a per diem for attending meetings, as approved by the board of supervisors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 12, effective May 18, 1956; 1996, ch. 230, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

262.760.
Annual budget.

Within the first quarter of each calendar year, the board of directors shall prepare an itemized budget of the funds needed for administration, construction, operation and maintenance of works of improvement. After approval of such budget by the board of supervisors, the board of directors shall, by order or resolution, levy a tax sufficient to meet such budget, either by millage rate or per acre rate. A copy of such budget and order or resolution shall be certified to the county clerk of the county or counties involved, and shall be submitted to the Department for Local Government as provided in KRS

65A.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 13, effective May 18, 1956; 1978, ch. 332, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 2000, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 40, § 73, effective March 21, 2013.

262.763.
Audit of accounts — Report of accountant — Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

For fiscal periods ending prior to July 1, 2014, an audit of the accounts of each watershed conservancy district shall take place once every four (4) years unless the district receives or expends seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) or more in any year, in which case the district shall provide for the performance of an annual audit. The audit shall be conducted in accordance with audit standards and requirements stipulated in KRS 65.065(5). The board of directors of each watershed conservancy district shall select to make the audit certified public accountants who have no personal interest in the financial affairs of the board of directors or in any of its officers or employees.

For fiscal periods beginning on and after July 1, 2015, the provisions of KRS

65A.030

shall apply to the audit of accounts of each watershed conservancy district.

Immediately upon completion of each audit, the accountant shall prepare a report of his findings and recommendations. This report shall be to the board of directors and in such number of copies as specified by the board of directors. The actual expense of any audit authorized under this section shall be borne by the watershed conservancy district.

The board of directors shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 152, § 1; 2000, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 114, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 40, § 74, effective March 21, 2013.

262.765.
Assessment of taxes — Tax rolls — Tax bills.

The board of directors of a watershed conservancy district shall prepare and furnish to the property valuation administrator by January 1 each year a list of the landowners in each county involved showing the real property subject to assessment, and the property valuation administrator of the county or counties involved shall indicate, for the use of the clerk, such information on the tax rolls. The list furnished the property valuation administrator by the board of directors shall: list the landowners in alphabetical order by taxing districts as shown on the previous year’s tax roll, list the total acreage and the acreage in the watershed conservancy district owned by each landowner, and show that part of the previous year’s assessment attributable to real property within the watershed conservancy district on those parcels which are not entirely within the district.

When the property tax rolls are delivered to the county clerk by the property valuation administrator, as required by law, the county clerk shall compute the tax due the district from each landowner in accordance with the rate fixed by the board of directors and the value or acreage of the real property indicated on the tax roll. The computation shall be made on the regular tax bills in such manner as may be directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 14; 1960, ch. 96, § 2; 1974, ch. 308, § 46; 1978, ch. 384, § 387, effective June 17, 1978; 2000, ch. 120, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 667, effective June 20, 2005.

262.770.
Collection of taxes — Discounts — Penalties — Interest.

The sheriff shall collect the taxes due the district at the same time and in the same manner in which he collects the state and county ad valorem tax and shall in like manner report to the county judge/executive, and make his annual and final settlement with the fiscal court of the county or counties involved. He shall be allowed a fee not to exceed four percent (4%) for collection of this tax.

Such taxes shall be subject to the same due and delinquency date, discounts, penalties, and interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 15, effective May 18, 1956; 1978, ch. 384, § 388, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A watershed district has no authority to pay the county clerk a fee for putting it on the tax receipt.

OAG 61-831

.

The county sheriff is authorized under this section to pursue delinquent soil and water conservation district taxes just as he would in the case of delinquent state and county taxes, including advertising the sale of delinquent tax claims under former KRS

134.440

(now repealed), since these taxes are considered county taxes under KRS

262.200

.

OAG 81-112

.

262.775.
Tax funds — Custody — Disbursement.

Tax funds collected shall be transferred to and held by the treasurer of the watershed conservancy district for the specific purpose for which they have been collected. All expenditures of such funds shall be made by the board of directors upon order of the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 16; 1964, ch. 117, § 10.

262.776.
Definitions for KRS 262.776 to 262.779.

As used in KRS

262.776

to

262.779

:

“Project” means the acquisition by a watershed conservancy district of easements, rights-of-way, or land by purchase or condemnation in order to enable the district to construct and maintain flood control structures or institute other beneficial flood control measures.

“Cost” means the cost of land, easements, or rights-of-way necessary for a project, and every expense connected with a project and accompanying bond issues, including engineers’ fees, attorney fees, publication of resolutions and notices, printing of bonds, interest which will accrue on the bonds until the due date of the first annual assessment levied in connection therewith the fee of a fiscal agent for advice as to the preparation and marketing of the bonds, and other costs of financing, as well as reasonable allowance for unforeseen contingencies.

“Benefited land” means land located within a flood plain area, as determined by the board of directors of a watershed conservancy district, which will derive direct benefits from a flood control project of the district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 116, § 1.

262.777.
Special assessment and bonds issued.

A special assessment may be voted and bonds issued which shall be payable solely from the collection of such assessments, as provided in KRS

262.778

and

262.779

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 116, § 2; 1966, ch. 23, § 73; 1978, ch. 332, § 15, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The special assessment tax authorized by this section may be levied even though the district has not levied a general tax pursuant to KRS 262.745(1) and

262.760

.

OAG 67-49

.

A conservancy district could not pay its maintenance bills from the assessment, for the assessments were designed only for the funding of a bond issue.

OAG 77-325

.

This section does not contemplate that an assessment will be used to build up substantial surpluses, for the assessment must be such that it will retire the bond issue over a period of time.

OAG 77-325

.

262.778.
Resolution for project — Notice, hearing — Election — Declaratory judgment or injunction suit, time for — Issuance of bonds — Levy.

Upon determination by the board of directors of a watershed conservancy district that a watershed project is necessary, and upon approval of the plans for same by the board of supervisors, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution which shall set out:

A description of the project in general terms;

A list of the benefited lands located in the flood plain, as determined by the board of directors, giving the acreage of such lands and the names of the owners thereof as defined by KRS 262.010(7) with a classification of such lands or parts thereof into classes in order that assessments may be made according to direct benefits;

The total cost of the project; and

The fact that the cost shall be met by a bond issue payable solely from annual assessments to be levied upon the lands set out in the resolution on the basis of a certain amount per acre according to benefits received, not to exceed in any one (1) year a sum per acre specified in the resolution, with the annual assessments to extend over a period of years specified in the resolution not to exceed thirty (30) years.

The board of directors shall cause due notice of the resolution to be given to all the owners of benefited lands, as determined by the board. Said notice shall set out the time and place of a meeting of the board of directors of the watershed conservancy district at which owners of benefited lands who may be liable for the annual assessments may be heard.

At the hearing upon the resolution, owners of benefited lands may voice their views concerning the proposed project as to whether said project should be undertaken, and the scope thereof, or the propriety of placing their lands in the project area or the degree of benefit received by their lands. The board shall prepare a record summarizing the proceedings. If the board of directors determines as a result of the hearing that the project should be carried out as planned, it may make such changes or revisions in the resolution as it deems proper and shall give due notice of an election to be held at which benefited landowners may vote on the question of annual special assessments to defray the cost of the project. The notice of the election shall include the text of the resolution of the board in its final form. The board of directors may give due notice as provided in KRS 262.010(4).

The board of directors shall prepare to be presented to the voters the question: “Should the assessment proposed by resolution of the . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Watershed Conservancy District be adopted?”. Voters shall be instructed to vote “yes” or “no.” Only owners of benefited land as set out in the resolution shall be eligible to vote. The board of directors may provide for a meeting of the landowners at which the vote may be cast, in which case qualified voters may vote by absentee vote. The board shall appoint a polling superintendent and other necessary election officers, giving representation to the opponents of the question as well as to proponents.

If a majority of those voting upon the proposition favor the assessment, the board shall give due notice of the vote and the fact that bonds will forthwith be issued payable from special assessments. Any owner of property to be benefited by the project may, within forty (40) days after publication of such notice, file an action in the Circuit Court of the county in which his lands are located seeking relief by declaratory judgment or injunction. If a suit is filed, the county attorney should represent the board of directors in upholding the validity of the proposed bond issue. After the lapse of time specified herein, all actions by owners of properties to be benefited shall be forever barred.

If no suit is filed and no injunction issued within the time allowed in subsection (5) of this section, the board of directors shall by resolution authorize the issuance of bonds designated “watershed project assessment bonds,” determining the principal amount thereof and establishing the denominations and maturity dates thereof and shall levy an annual assessment effective only upon the benefited properties and based on the acreage thereof. The annual rate of such assessments shall be fixed when other taxes of the district are levied and shall be sufficient in each year to provide for the payment of such bonds and interest coupons as they mature and sufficient to provide a fund equal to twenty percent (20%) of the average annual principal and interest requirements, the same to constitute a “debt service reserve” as a precaution against possible default by failure to collect annual levies. The bonds shall state on their face that they do not constitute a debt of the district but are payable solely from collection of special assessments made upon benefited lands lying in the watershed conservancy district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 116, §§ 3, 4; 1966, ch. 23, § 74; 1982, ch. 360, § 83, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 51, § 8, effective June 26, 2007.

262.779.
Annual assessments made, how — Lien.

The annual assessments shall be made by the board of directors at the same time and in the same manner as provided in KRS

262.765

for taxes generally and shall be collected as provided in KRS

262.770

. The assessments shall constitute liens against the land benefited and shall attach to the land, taking precedence over all other liens except state, county and municipal taxes and prior improvement assessments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 116, § 5.

262.780.
Petition for annexation of lands — Requirements — Parties — Hearing — Determination — Referendum.

Any one (1) or more owners of land may petition the board of supervisors to have their lands added to a watershed conservancy district. Such petition shall define the boundaries of the land desired to be annexed, the number of acres of land involved, and other information pertinent to such proposal. When the boundary described embraces lands of others than the petitioners, the petition shall so state and shall be signed by twenty-five (25) or more of the landowners in the territory described, if fifty (50) or more such owners are involved, or by a majority if less than fifty (50) landowners are involved.

Within thirty (30) days after such petition is filed, the board shall cause due notice to be given, as provided in KRS 262.010(4), of a hearing on such petition. All interested parties shall have a right to attend such hearing and be heard. The board shall determine whether the lands described in the petition or any portion thereof shall be included in the district. If all the landowners in the territory involved are not petitioners, a referendum shall be held within such territory as provided in KRS

262.725

,

262.730

and

262.735

, before making a final determination. If it is determined that such land should be added, this fact shall be certified by the board of supervisors to the county clerk in the county or counties involved. After recording, the certification shall be filed with the State Soil Conservation Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 17, effective May 18, 1956; 1978, ch. 384, § 389, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 218, § 7, effective July 13, 1984.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by 1984 Acts Chapter 100, § 24, and 1984 Acts Chapter 218, § 7, which are in conflict and cannot be compiled together. Pursuant to KRS

446.250

, the amendment in Chapter 218, § 7 prevails as the later amendment.

262.785.
Petition for detachment of lands — Requirements — Hearing — Determination.

The owner or owners of lands which have not been, are not, and cannot be benefited by their inclusion in the watershed conservancy district may petition the board of supervisors to have such lands detached. The petition shall describe such lands and state the reasons why they should be detached. A hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days after the petition is received. Due notice of such hearing as provided in KRS 262.010(4) shall be given at least ten (10) days before the hearing. If it is determined by the board of supervisors that such lands shall be detached, such determination shall be certified to the county clerk of each county in which any portion of such lands lie. After recording, the certification shall be filed with the State Soil Conservation Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 203, § 18, effective May 18, 1956.

262.790.
Procedure for discontinuance of district. [Repealed.]

262.791.
District discontinued, when — Hearing referendum.

Ten (10) years subsequent to the organization of a watershed conservancy district a majority of the landowners within the district may file a petition with the board of supervisors praying that the existence of the district be discontinued. The petition shall state the reason for discontinuance and that all obligations of the district have been met;

After giving due notice as defined in KRS

262.010

(4), the board of supervisors shall conduct a hearing on the petition for the purpose of determining whether the reasons given for discontinuance are valid and that all obligations have been met. Obligations shall include written agreements and contracts officially entered into by the district and any duty imposed upon the district by law;

If evidence presented during the hearing, as determined by the board of supervisors, reveals that all obligations have not been met, the petition for discontinuance shall be denied. If it is determined that all obligations have been met, the supervisor shall, within sixty (60) days, hold a referendum as provided in KRS

262.750

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 117, § 6.